Utah statutes.
72-4-209.   Mormon Pioneer Heritage Area.
(1)  There is established a state heritage area known as the Mormon Pioneer
Heritage Area comprising a section of Route 89 beginning in Fairview to Kanab
and including the Boulder Loop in Garfield and Wayne Counties.
(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of
Transportation shall designate the portions of the highway identified in
Subsection (1) as the Mormon Pioneer Heritage Area on future state highway
maps.
